Colorado statutes. TITLE 26.5 Early Childhood Programs and Services
PART 3 CHILD CARE LICENSING
26.5-5-326. Exempt family child care home providers - fingerprint-based criminal history record check - child care assistance program money - temporary care - rules - definitions.

An exempt family child care home provider who provides care for a child and an individual who provides care for a child who is related to the individual, referred to collectively in this section as a "qualified provider", is subject to a fingerprint-based criminal history record check, referred to in this section as an "FCC", as provided in this section and the rules authorized in section 26.5-5-316 (1)(a)(I) and (1)(a)(II), if the child's care is funded in whole or in part with money received on the child's behalf from the publicly funded Colorado child care assistance program. The provisions of this section apply to exempt family child care home providers or individuals who provide care to a related child who receive money from the publicly funded Colorado child care assistance program pursuant to contracts or other payment agreements entered into or renewed on or after May 25, 2006.
(1) (a) (I) An exempt family child care home provider who provides care for a child and an individual who provides care for a child who is related to the individual, referred to collectively in this section as a "qualified provider", is subject to a fingerprint-based criminal history record check, referred to in this section as an "FCC", as provided in this section and the rules authorized in section 26.5-5-316 (1)(a)(I) and (1)(a)(II), if the child's care is funded in whole or in part with money received on the child's behalf from the publicly funded Colorado child care assistance program. The provisions of this section apply to exempt family child care home providers or individuals who provide care to a related child who receive money from the publicly funded Colorado child care assistance program pursuant to contracts or other payment agreements entered into or renewed on or after May 25, 2006.

Each adult eighteen years of age or older who resides with a qualified provider where the care is provided, referred to in this section as a "qualified adult", is subject to the FCC required pursuant to this section.

The FCC required for a qualified provider or qualified adult pursuant to this section must include a fingerprint-based criminal history records check utilizing the records of the Colorado bureau of investigation and, for qualified providers or qualified adults applying for child care assistance program money on or after August 10, 2011, the federal bureau of investigation. As part of the FCC, the department shall access the records and reports of child abuse or neglect maintained by the state department of human services to determine whether the subject of the FCC has been found to be responsible in a confirmed report of child abuse or neglect. Information shall be made available pursuant to section 19-1-307 (2)(j), and rules promulgated by the state board of human services pursuant to section 19-3-313.5 (4).

The FCC required pursuant to this section is a prerequisite to the issuance or renewal of a contract for receipt of money under the Colorado child care assistance program as provided in part 1 of article 4 of this title 26.5. The department shall not issue or renew a contract for payment of money under the Colorado child care assistance program to a qualified provider who fails to submit to the FCC or fails to submit fingerprints for a qualified adult.

A qualified provider shall notify the county with whom the qualified provider has contracted pursuant to the Colorado child care assistance program upon any change of circumstances that results in the presence of a new qualified adult. A new qualified adult is required to undergo an FCC as provided in this section, even if the Colorado child care assistance program contract is not subject to renewal when the qualified adult moves into the residence where the care is provided.

A qualified provider or qualified adult who undergoes an FCC shall, with submittal of fingerprints, pay to the state department a fee established by department rule pursuant to subsection (6) of this section to offset the costs associated with processing the FCC through the Colorado bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation.

When the results of an FCC performed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section reveal a record of arrest without a disposition, the department shall require that person to submit to a name-based judicial record check, as defined in section 22-2-119.3 (6)(d).

A person who undergoes a name-based judicial record check shall pay to the department a fee established by department rule pursuant to subsection (6) of this section to offset the costs associated with performing the name-based judicial record check.

The department or a county department shall not issue or renew a contract to provide money to a qualified provider under the Colorado child care assistance program pursuant to part 1 of article 4 of this title 26.5 if the qualified provider or a qualified adult has been convicted of:

Child abuse, as described in section 18-6-401;

A crime of violence, as defined in section 18-1.3-406;

Any felony offense involving unlawful sexual behavior, as defined in section 16-22-102 (9);

Any felony, the underlying factual basis of which has been found by the court on the record to include an act of domestic violence, as defined in section 18-6-800.3;

Any felony involving physical assault, battery, or a drug-related offense within the five years preceding the date of the FCC; or

Any offense in any other state, the elements of which are substantially similar to the elements of any one of the offenses described in subsections (3)(a) to (3)(e) of this section.

The department or a county department shall not issue or renew a contract to provide money pursuant to the Colorado child care assistance program pursuant to part 1 of article 4 of this title 26.5 to a qualified provider if the qualified provider or a qualified adult:

Has a pattern of misdemeanor or petty offense convictions occurring within the ten years preceding submission of the application, including petty offense convictions pursuant to section 26.5-5-321. The executive director shall define by rule what constitutes a pattern of misdemeanor or petty offense convictions.

Has been determined to be insane or mentally incompetent by a court of competent jurisdiction and a court has entered, pursuant to part 3 or 4 of article 14 of title 15, or section 27-65-109 (4) or 27-65-127, an order specifically finding that the mental incompetency or insanity is of such a degree that the qualified provider cannot safely operate a child care home. The record of the determination and entry of the order are conclusive evidence thereof. A qualified provider shall sign an attestation affirming the lack of such a finding prior to entering into or renewing a contract for money under the Colorado child care assistance program, pursuant to section 26.5-4-112 (2).

A qualified provider who has submitted to an FCC by the Colorado bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation may, pending the receipt of the results of the FCC, continue to receive money from the Colorado child care assistance program.

The executive director shall promulgate rules to establish the amount of the fee to collect from a qualified provider or qualified adult who is subject to an FCC pursuant to subsection (1) of this section or a name-based judicial record check pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. The state department is authorized to collect the fee at the time of the FCC or name-based judicial record check.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 769, § 3, effective July 1; (2) and (6) amended, (HB 22-1270), ch. 114, p. 532, § 51, effective April 21.

26.5-5-327. Unique student identifying numbers - rules.

The executive director shall promulgate rules as necessary for the assignment of uniquely identifying numbers to children who receive early childhood services. At a minimum, the rules must include children who receive state-subsidized or federally subsidized early childhood services, including but not limited to services provided through the child care development block grant, the Colorado universal preschool program, and head start.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 771, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6-121 (3) as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-5-328. Applications for licenses - authority to suspend licenses - rules - definitions.

Every application by an individual for a license issued by the department or any authorized agent of the department must require the applicant's name, address, and social security number or tax identification number.

The department or any authorized agent of the department shall deny, suspend, or revoke a license pursuant to the provisions of section 26-13-126, and any rules promulgated to implement said section, if the department or agent receives a notice to deny, suspend, or revoke from the state child support enforcement agency because the licensee or applicant is out of compliance with a court or administrative order for current child support, child support debt, retroactive child support, child support arrearages, or child support when combined with maintenance or because the licensee or applicant has failed to comply with a properly issued subpoena or warrant relating to a paternity or child support proceeding. Any such denial, suspension, or revocation must be in accordance with the procedures specified by rule of the department of human services and rules promulgated by the state board of human services for the implementation of section 26-13-126.

The department shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the state child support enforcement agency, which memorandum must identify the relative responsibilities of the department and the state child support enforcement agency with respect to the implementation of this section and section 26-13-126.

The executive director may promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this section.

As used in this section, "license" means any recognition, authority, or permission that the department or any authorized agent of the department is authorized by law to issue for an individual to practice a profession or occupation or recreational activity. "License" includes, but is not limited to, a license, certificate, certification, letter of authorization, or registration issued for an individual to practice a profession or occupation or for an individual to participate in a recreational activity.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 772, § 3, effective July 1.

26.5-5-329. Testing for the presence of lead in drinking water in child care centers and family child care homes - compliance with public health requirements - repeal.

Each child care center and, unless it has opted out pursuant to section 25-8-903 (1)(a), each family child care home shall comply with the requirements of part 9 of article 8 of title 25 concerning testing of water in child care centers, family child care homes, and eligible schools.

This section is repealed, effective June 30, 2026.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1358), ch. 382, p. 2736, § 4, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section was numbered as § 26-6-123 in HB 22-1358 but was renumbered and relocated on revision due to the relocation of part 1 of article 6 of title 26 to this part 3 by HB 22-1295.